sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuunnjel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuuʹnnjel e-stem pöly: # Noun "Smew/uivelo"- full paradigm
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Nom: njuuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Gen: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Acc: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Ill: njuʹnnjla
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Loc: njuʹnnjlest
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Com: njuʹnnjlin
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Ess: njuʹnnjlen
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Par: njuʹnnjled
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Sg+Abe: [njuʹnnjeltaa, njuʹnnjeltää]
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Nom: njuʹnnjel
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Gen: njuʹnnjli
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Acc: njuʹnnjlid
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Ill: njuʹnnjlid
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Loc: njuʹnnjlin
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Com: njuʹnnjlivuiʹm
     njuuʹnnjel+N+Pl+Abe: [njuʹnnjlitaa, njuʹnnjlitää]
